Washington statutes.
RCW 9.100.060

Administrator—Appointment.

The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to designate and appoint a state officer to act as the administrator who shall perform the duties and functions and exercise the powers conferred upon such person by Article VII of the agreement on detainers.

[ 1967 c 34 s 6.]